District of Columbia statutes.
50-2502

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Bond” or “bonds” means any revenue bond, note, or other obligation (including refunding bonds, notes, or other obligations) to borrow money to finance, to assist in financing, or to refinance undertakings authorized by this chapter.

(2)

“Parking facility” means any area, lot, structure, building, garage or other means for the storage or parking of automobiles, trucks, or other motorized or nonmotorized vehicles, including the vehicular and pedestrian access thereto, that may be established, constructed, erected, acquired, owned or leased, maintained or operated by the Authority. “Parking facility” also includes those appurtenances such as parking meters, automatic gates or security systems that may be acquired, owned, or leased by the Authority.

Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-153, § 3, 41 DCR 4652
1981 Ed., § 40-842.